Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-943
State medicaid fraud control unit; certification.

The Attorney General shall:

(1) Establish a state medicaid fraud control unit that meets the standards prescribed by 42 U.S.C. 1396b(q); and

(2) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for certification of the unit under 42 U.S.C. 1396b(q).

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1082;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 43.